Washington statutes.
RCW 43.44.120

Premises with guard animals—Registration, posting—Acts permitted firefighters—Liability for injury to firefighters.

(1) All premises guarded by guard animals, which are animals professionally trained to defend and protect premises or the occupants of the premises, shall be registered with the local fire department. Front entrances to residences and all entrances to business premises shall be posted in a visible location with signs approved by the chief of the Washington state patrol, through the director of fire protection, indicating that guard animals are present.

(2) A firefighter, who reasonably believes that his or her safety is endangered by the presence of a guard animal, may without liability: (a) Refuse to enter the premises, or (b) take any reasonable action necessary to protect himself or herself from attack by the guard animal.

(3) If the person responsible for the guard animal being on the premises does not comply with subsection (1) of this section, that person may be held liable for any injury to the firefighter caused by the presence of the guard animal.

[ 1995 c 369 s 35; 1986 c 266 s 90; 1983 c 258 s 1. Formerly RCW 48.48.150.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1995 c 369: See note following RCW 43.43.930.

Severability—1986 c 266: See note following RCW 38.52.005.